da: Medfølgende tilbehør til tin whistle: Etui; Rensepind; Grebstabel; Instruktionsbog; Halsrem; Pose/taske; Ekstra fløjtehoved; Stativ; Tommelstøtte; Stemmefedt; Andet
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos da flauta irlandesa: Estojo; Vareta de limpeza; Tabela de digitação; Livro de instruções; Fita de pescoço; Bolsa/saco; Cabeça de flauta sobresselente; Suporte; Descanso de polegar; Massa de afinação; Outro
nb: Blikkfløyte inkludert tilbehør: Etui; Rensestang; Grepstabell; Instruksjonsbok; Nakkestropp; Veske/pose; Ekstra fløytehode; Stativ; Tommelstøtte; Smørefett for stemming; Annet
nl: Tin whistle meegeleverde accessoires: Koffer; Wisstaaf; Grepentabel; Instructieboek; Nekkoord; Etui/tas; Reserve-fluitkop; Standaard; Duimsteun; Stemvet; Overige
ko: 틴 휘슬 포함 액세서리: 케이스; 클리닝 로드; 운지표; 설명서; 넥 랜야드; 파우치/가방; 여분 휘슬 헤드; 스탠드; 엄지 받침대; 튜닝 그리스; 기타
vi: Bao gồm cả phụ kiện còi thiếc: Hộp đựng; Que vệ sinh; Biểu đồ bấm nốt; Sách hướng dẫn; Dây đeo cổ; Túi/Bao đựng; Đầu kèn dự phòng; Chân đế; Chỗ tựa ngón cái; Mỡ bôi trơn chỉnh âm; Khác
zh-CN: 锡哨所含配件: 盒; 清洁棒; 指法表; 指导手册; 挂脖挂绳; 收纳袋/包; 备用哨头; 支架; 拇指托; 调音润滑脂; 其他
it: Accessori inclusi con il tin whistle: Custodia; Asta per la pulizia; Schema delle diteggiature; Manuale di istruzioni; Cordino da collo; Astuccio/borsa; Testata di ricambio; Supporto; Poggiadito; Grasso per accordatura; Altro
zh-TW: 錫哨笛包含配件: 收納盒; 清潔棒; 指法表; 說明書; 頸部掛繩; 收納袋/提袋; 備用哨頭; 支架; 拇指靠座; 調音潤滑脂; 其他
th: หมายเลขประจำตัวผู้เสียภาษีนกหวีดรวมอุปกรณ์เสริม: เคส; ไม้ทำความสะอาด; แผนผังการวางนิ้ว; หนังสือคู่มือ; สายคล้องคอ; ซอง/กระเป๋า; หัวขลุ่ยสำรอง; ขาตั้ง; ที่วางนิ้วโป้ง; จาระบีปรับเสียง; อื่นๆ
sv: Ingående tillbehör för tennvisselpipa: Fodral; Rengöringsstav; Grepptabell; Instruktionsbok; Halsrem; Påse/väska; Extra munstycke; Stativ; Tumstöd; Stämfett; Övrigt
ru: Входящие аксессуары ирландской флейты: Футляр; Шомпол; Таблица аппликатур; Самоучитель; Шейный шнурок; Чехол/сумка; Запасной мундштук; Подставка; Опора для большого пальца; Смазка для настройки; Другое
sk-SK: Plechová píšťalka vrátane príslušenstva: Puzdro; Čistiaca tyčinka; Tabuľka hmatov; Kniha s pokynmi; Šnúrka na krk; Vrecko/taška; Náhradná hlava píšťalky; Stojan; Opierka palca; Ladiaci maz; Iné
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für die Tin Whistle: Etui; Wischerstab; Grifftabelle; Lehrbuch; Umhängeband; Tasche/Beutel; Ersatzkopf; Ständer; Daumenstütze; Stimmfett; Sonstige
es: Accesorios incluidos con la flauta irlandesa: Estuche; Varilla de limpieza; Tabla de digitación; Libro de instrucciones; Cordón para el cuello; Bolsa/funda; Cabezal de repuesto; Soporte; Apoyo para el pulgar; Grasa de afinación; Otro
pt-BR: Apito irlandês acessórios incluídos: Estojo; Vareta de limpeza; Tabela de dedilhado; Livro de instruções; Cordão de pescoço; Bolsa/sacola; Bocal sobressalente; Suporte; Apoio de polegar; Graxa de afinação; Outros
lt-LT: Įtraukti airiškos fleitos priedai: Dėklas; Valymo strypelis; Pirštuotės schema; Mokomoji knygelė; Kaklo dirželis; Maišelis / krepšys; Atsarginė švilpynės galvutė; Stovas; Atrama nykščiui; Derinimo tepalas; Kita
hr-HR: Oprema uključena sa kositrenom zviždaljkom: Kovčeg; Šipka za čišćenje; Tablica prstohvata; Knjiga s uputama; Traka za vrat; Torbica/vrećica; Rezervna glava zviždaljke; Stalak; Oslonac za palac; Mast za ugađanje; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki k irski piščali: Etui; Čistilna palčka; Prijemalna tabela; Priročnik z navodili; Trak za okoli vratu; Torbica/vrečka; Nadomestna glava piščali; Stojalo; Naslon za palec; Mast za uglaševanje; Drugo
cs: Příslušenství irské flétny v balení: Pouzdro; Vytěrák; Hmatová tabulka; Návod; Šňůrka na krk; Vak / taška; Náhradní hlavice; Stojánek; Opěrka palce; Ladicí mazivo; Jiné
fr: Accessoires inclus avec la flûte irlandaise: Étui; Tige de nettoyage; Tableau de doigtés; Livret d’instructions; Tour de cou; Pochette/sac; Tête de rechange; Support; Repose-pouce; Graisse d’accordage; Autre
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru fluier irlandez: Casetă; Tijă de curățare; Schemă de digitație; Manual de instrucțiuni; Șnur pentru gât; Săculeț/Geantă; Muștiuc de rezervă; Suport; Suport pentru degetul mare; Unsoare pentru acordaj; Altele
tr: Dahil olan teneke düdük aksesuarları: Kutu; Temizleme çubuğu; Parmak pozisyonu tablosu; Eğitim kitabı; Boyun askısı; Kılıf/Çanta; Yedek düdük başlığı; Stand; Başparmak dayanağı; Akort gresi; Diğer
fi: Huilun lisävarusteet: Kotelo; Puhdistustikku; Sormitustaulukko; Ohjekirja; Kaulanauha; Pussi/laukku; Varasuukappale; Teline; Peukalotuki; Viritysrasva; Muu
pl: Akcesoria flażoletu w zestawie: Etui; Wycior; Tabela chwytów; Książka instruktażowa; Smycz na szyję; Woreczek/torba; Zapasowy ustnik; Statyw; Podpórka pod kciuk; Smar do strojenia; Inne
ja: ブリキ笛アクセサリー付き: ケース; クリーニングロッド; 運指表; 教則本; ネックストラップ; ポーチ/バッグ; 予備のホイッスルヘッド; スタンド; サムレスト; チューニンググリス; その他
bg-BG: Включени принадлежности за тенекиената свирка: Калъф; Пръчка за почистване; Таблица с пръстовки; Книга с инструкции; Лента за врата; Торбичка/чанта; Резервна глава за свирка; Стойка; Опора за палеца; Смазка за настройване; Друго
en: Tin whistle included accessories: Case; Cleaning rod; Fingering chart; Instruction book; Neck lanyard; Pouch/Bag; Spare whistle head; Stand; Thumb rest; Tuning grease; Other
hu: Fémsíphoz tartozó kiegészítők: Tok; Tisztítópálca; Ujjrendtáblázat; Oktatókönyv; Nyakpánt; Tasak/táska; Pót sípfej; Állvány; Hüvelykujjtámasz; Hangolózsír; Egyéb
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ για τη φλογέρα: Θήκη; Ράβδος καθαρισμού; Διάγραμμα δακτυλισμών; Βιβλίο οδηγιών; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Πουγκί/Τσάντα; Ανταλλακτική κεφαλή σφυρίχτρας; Βάση; Στήριγμα αντίχειρα; Γράσο κουρδίσματος; Άλλο